Arkansas, session 2025, HB1622.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-77-1702(2), concerning the definition of
"adverse decision" within the Medicaid Fairness Act, is amended to read as
follows:
(2)(A) “Adverse decision” means any decision by the Department
of Human Services or its reviewers or contractors that adversely affects a
Medicaid provider or recipient in regard to:
(i) Receipt of and payment for Medicaid claims and
services, including, but not limited to, decisions as to:
(a) Appropriate level of care or coding;
(b) Medical necessity;
(c) Prior authorization;
*JMB333*
03-17-2025 12:00:57 JMB333

As Engrossed: H3/17/25 HB1622
(d) Concurrent reviews;
(e) Retrospective reviews;
(f) Least restrictive setting;
(g) Desk audits;
(h) Field audits and onsite audits; and
(i) Inspections or surveys; and
(ii) Payment amounts due to or from a particular
provider resulting from gain sharing, risk sharing, incentive payments, or
another reimbursement mechanism or methodology, including calculations that
affect or have the potential to affect payment; and
(iii) Imposition of corrective action plans.
(B) To constitute an adverse decision, an agency decision
need not have a monetary penalty attached but must have or a direct monetary
consequence to the provider.
(C) “Adverse decision” does not include the design of or
changes to an element of a reimbursement methodology or payment system that
is of general applicability and implemented through the rulemaking process;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 20-77-1704(a) and (b), concerning the
allowance of a provider administrative appeal under the Medicaid Fairness
Act, are amended to read as follows:
(a) The General Assembly finds it necessary to:
(1) Clarify its intent that providers have the right to
administrative reconsideration and fair and impartial administrative appeals;
and
(2) Emphasize that this right of administrative reconsideration
and appeal is to be liberally construed and not limited through technical or
procedural arguments by the Department of Human Services.
(b)(1)(A) In response to an adverse decision, a provider may request
an administrative reconsideration with the Department of Human Services and
may appeal to the Office of Medicaid Provider Appeals with the Department of
Health on behalf of the recipient or on its own behalf, or both, regardless
of whether the provider is an individual or a corporation.
(B)(i) A provider appeal shall be governed by the Arkansas
Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq., except as otherwise
provided in this subchapter.
03-17-2025 12:00:57 JMB333

As Engrossed: H3/17/25 HB1622
(ii) Multiple appeals by the same provider may be
consolidated.
(C) An administrative law judge employed by the Department
of Health shall conduct all Medicaid provider administrative appeals of
adverse decisions under this subchapter.
(2) The provider may appear:
(A) In person or through a corporate representative; or
(B) With prior notice to the Department of Health, through
legal counsel.
(3)(A) A Medicaid recipient may attend any hearing related to
his or her care, but the Department of Health may not make his or her
participation a requirement for provider appeals.
(B) The Department of Health may compel the recipient's
presence via subpoena, but failure of the recipient to appear shall not
preclude the provider appeal.

/s/Gramlich



















03-17-2025 12:00:57 JMB333